Louisiana, session 2026, HB472.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 51 of Title 33 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 33:9731, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 51. AUTHORITY FOR MUNICIPALITIES TO IMPLEMENT RENT
STABILIZATION
§9731. Authority for municipalities to implement rent stabilization
A municipality or parish may, by a majority vote of its governing authority,
adopt ordinances to implement rent stabilization measures.